California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) The policy of conducting voluntary repressuring operations in a pool or pools, or portions thereof, in order to arrest or ameliorate subsidence, or for any other lawful purpose, whether individually or by unit or co-operative agreement, shall be encouraged by the supervisor. Nothing contained in this article shall be deemed to prohibit the supervisor from approving voluntary repressuring operations in any pool or pools, or part thereof, pursuant to this article or any other provision of Division 3 (commencing at Section 3000) of the Public Resources Code prior to adoption of a repressuring plan and specifications under Section 3319 or 3319.1, if in his judgment such repressuring operations are not detrimental to the intent and purposes of this article to arrest or ameliorate subsidence, or are not otherwise unlawful. At any time after the adoption of a repressuring plan and specifications therefor, as provided in Section 3319.1, or the adoption of the fieldwide repressuring plan and specifications therefor, as provided in Section 3319, and prior to the issuance of a unit order, the supervisor shall, upon request being made therefor, analyze any such currently conducted repressuring operations, and any proposed plan of repressuring operations to determine whether such operations are or would be in conformity, or could be made to conform, with either of the foregoing adopted repressuring plans and specifications. If the supervisor determines that such existing or proposed repressuring operations do conform, or if he determines that such operations can be made to conform, and the respective party or parties thereto agree to the recommended modifications, he shall approve such voluntary repressuring operations. Upon such approval by the supervisor, the party or parties thereto shall be entitled to continue or proceed with such repressuring operations without specific direction or order from the supervisor, except as provided in subdivision (c) hereof.

The provisions of Section 6879 shall apply to any such voluntary or co-operative agreement which includes tide and submerged lands of the State which have been granted to a city, county, city and county or district by a grant which does not except and reserve to the State all deposits of minerals, including oil and gas, in said lands.

(b) In the event any proposed plan of repressuring operations is not commenced or any proposed unit or co-operative agreement which has been approved by the supervisor, is not executed and operations commenced thereunder by the respective parties thereto within the time specified in the order of the supervisor approving the same, or within any extension thereof granted by the supervisor, for good cause shown, but in no event longer than 90 days from the expiration date specified in the order of approval, the order of the supervisor shall be deemed automatically revoked, without further action, and the supervisor shall take such appropriate action as authorized by this article.

(c) The supervisor shall, at all times, have access to and may inspect all repressuring operations referred to in subdivision (a) hereof for the purpose of determining that performance is being conducted in accordance with the repressuring plan or plans and specifications of work to be done thereunder adopted pursuant to Section 3319 or 3319.1, or in accordance with the orders of the supervisor approving repressuring operations, and shall have power to require such operations to conform to the said repressuring plan or plans and specifications of work to be done thereunder adopted by, or orders theretofore made by the supervisor, and to otherwise enforce compliance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3320.1.

(a) An agreement for the management, development and operation of two or more tracts in a pool or pools, or portions thereof, in a field as a unit without regard to separate ownerships for the production of oil and gas, including repressuring operations therein, and for the allocation of benefits and costs on a basis set forth in the agreement, shall be valid and binding upon those who consent thereto and may be filed with the supervisor for approval.

Any agreement for the cooperative management, development and operation of two or more tracts in a pool or pools, or portions thereof, in a field for the production of oil or gas, including repressuring operations therein, shall be valid and binding upon those who consent thereto and may be filed with the supervisor for approval.

If in the judgment of the supervisor a unit agreement or cooperative agreement filed for approval is not detrimental to the intent and purposes of this article to arrest or ameliorate subsidence, or otherwise unlawful, the supervisor may approve the agreement. No such agreement approved by the supervisor hereunder or heretofore approved pursuant to applicable law prior to the enactment of this article shall be held to violate any of the statutes of this state prohibiting monopolies or acts, arrangements, agreements, contracts, combinations or conspiracies in restraint of trade or commerce.

(b) In the event that at the time of the approval by the supervisor of a unit or cooperative agreement under subdivision (a), the supervisor makes written findings of all of the following:

(1) A primary purpose of the unit or cooperative agreement is the initiation and conduct of repressuring operations in the area covered thereby for the purpose of arresting or ameliorating subsidence.

(2) The initiation and conduct of repressuring operations in the area covered by the unit or cooperative agreement are feasible and compatible with the purposes of this article.

(3) The persons who are entitled to 75 percent of the proceeds of production of oil and gas within the area covered by the unit or cooperative agreement (measured by the production of oil and gas therein in the last calendar year preceding the date of such approval) have become parties to such agreement by signing or ratifying it.

(4) It is necessary, in order to initiate and conduct repressuring operations, that the properties of nonconsenting persons who own working interests or royalty interests in lands within the area covered by the unit or cooperative agreement become subject to the agreement.

(5) The agreement is fair and reasonable, and contains appropriate provisions to protect and safeguard the rights of all persons having an interest in oil and gas production in the area covered thereby.

Then the supervisor shall make and enter an order which shall provide that unless the nonconsenting persons, within 30 days after service upon those persons of the order in the manner specified by the supervisor, become parties to the agreement by signing or ratifying the agreement, the right of eminent domain may be exercised as provided in subdivision (c) for the purpose of acquiring the properties of the nonconsenting persons which are found by the supervisor to be necessary for the initiation and conduct of the repressuring operations.

If the supervisor makes findings in accordance with the foregoing, the findings shall be prima facie evidence of all of the following:

(A) Of the public necessity of the development and operation of the properties in accordance with the unit or cooperative agreement and of the repressuring operations to be initiated and conducted pursuant to the agreement.

(B) That the acquisition of the properties of the nonconsenting persons which are designated by the supervisor is necessary therefor.

(C) That the repressuring and other operations to be initiated and conducted pursuant to the agreement, and the improvements to be made in connection therewith are planned or located in the manner which will be most compatible with the greatest public good and the least private injury.

The acquisition and use of land, including oil and gas rights therein, and personal property used in the production of oil and gas within a subsidence area for the purposes and by the persons mentioned in this section under the circumstances herein specified, are public uses on behalf of which the right of eminent domain may be exercised.

(c) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (b), the right of eminent domain for the purposes therein mentioned may be exercised by any city, county, or city and county, which has agreed to commit the properties to be acquired to such unit or cooperative agreement, or which has agreed to convey all or a portion of said properties upon acquisition, for a price not less than the cost of acquiring the same, to working interest owners who are parties to such unit or cooperative agreement and who have agreed to commit such properties to said agreement.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), any condemnation action brought hereunder shall be governed by Title 7 (commencing with Section 1230. 010) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

If a condemnation action or actions to acquire the properties of the nonconsenting persons are promptly commenced and diligently prosecuted to final judgment by which the properties are acquired, no compulsory unit order affecting the area covered by the agreement shall be made by the supervisor under Section 3321 with respect to that area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

3320.2.

If the supervisor determines that sufficient of the working interest owners and royalty interest owners to make repressuring operations feasible in any pool or pools, or portions thereof, for which a repressuring plan and specifications have been adopted by the supervisor, have not prior thereto, or within the time designated in the order of the supervisor adopting such plan and specifications, entered into a unit agreement or co-operative agreement, or have not taken individual action under which the repressuring operations contemplated by such plan will be satisfactorily initiated and conducted, the supervisor shall have power to compel the unitization of all interests in such pool or pools, or portions thereof, in the manner and subject to the limitations set forth in this article.

If the supervisor shall compel the unitization of the interests in any pool or pools, or portions thereof, in a field as provided in Section 3321, the supervisor shall have power to order repressuring operations to be initiated and conducted in the unit area in accordance with the applicable repressuring plan and specifications previously adopted by the supervisor; provided, however, that no order compelling unitization or order requiring the initiation and conduct of repressuring operations in the unit area shall be made unless the supervisor shall find:

(1) That the initiation and conduct of such repressuring operations will not substantially reduce the maximum economic quantity of oil or gas ultimately recoverable from the unit area as a whole under prudent and proper operations.

(2) That the estimated cost of initiating and carrying out such repressuring operations within the unit area as a whole, including both capital and operating costs, will not exceed the estimated value of the increased production resulting therefrom.

The supervisor shall have continuing jurisdiction to review the results of repressuring operations previously ordered by the supervisor and to make such further orders as may be necessary or desirable under the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3320.3.

In determining, as required by Section 3320.2, whether the estimated cost of initiating and conducting such repressuring operations will exceed the estimated value of the increased production resulting from such operations, the supervisor shall exclude from consideration that portion of the cost of initiating and conducting such repressuring operations which any interested person or persons agree to bear, in addition to the portion of the cost of such operations which such person or persons would otherwise be obligated to bear pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (e) of Section 3322 under arrangements for the conditional repayment of such excess portion from increased production as follows:

(a) Each person bearing a part of such excess portion of the cost of initiating and conducting such repressuring operations shall recover the amount so borne, plus interest on the unpaid balance thereof at the rate of 312 percent per annum compounded semiannually by receiving, until fully repaid, his pro rata share, based upon his proportionate contribution from an amount not less than 60 percent or more than 90 percent, which, in the judgment of the supervisor, shall from time to time be determined to be fair and reasonable to all persons concerned, of that proportion of the increased production thereafter produced that the said excess portion of the cost of initiating and conducting such repressuring operations bears to the total cost of initiating and conducting such repressuring operations.

(b) If the supervisor shall find the offer of such person or persons to bear the excess portion of the cost of initiating and conducting such repressuring operations to be feasible, fair and reasonable, any order for repressuring operations made by the supervisor, in addition to its other provisions, shall set forth the time, manner and terms upon which such excess portion of the cost of initiating and conducting repressuring operations shall be borne by such person or persons until repaid to such person or persons from increased production as above provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3320.4.

In order to encourage the initiation and conduct of repressuring operations with the greatest possible speed in a subsidence area, the State, or any city, or county, city and county, or other political subdivision, deriving revenues from oil or gas produced from tide or submerged lands may expend such revenues for the purpose of bearing that portion of the cost of initiating and conducting repressuring operations in such subsidence area:

(1) In excess of that share of such costs which would otherwise be borne by such person pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 3322 as a participant in a unit created by order of the supervisor pursuant to Section 3322 under arrangements for conditional repayment as above provided, or

(2) In excess of that share of such costs which would otherwise be borne by such person as a participant in a unit under a unit agreement voluntarily entered into under arrangements for conditional repayment satisfactory to such person and the other working interest owners interested in said unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3320.5.

No working or royalty interest owner shall be liable for any loss or damage resulting from repressuring or other operations connected with the production of oil and gas which are conducted, without negligence, pursuant to and in accordance with a co-operative or unit agreement ordered or approved by the supervisor pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3321.

(a) Subject to the limitations specified in this article, the supervisor shall have the power to issue a compulsory unit order upon the petition of a city, county, city and county, any part of which is in a subsidence area, or any contractor or lessee for the production of oil or gas therefor, or any person or persons owning working interests in the area affected by such order. The supervisor shall, prior to the issuance of each compulsory unit order, schedule a public hearing thereon. Such hearing may embrace all or a portion of those land areas, and the pool or pools, or portions thereof, underlying such areas, which have been theretofore included in one of the repressuring plans referred to in Section 3319 or 3319.1, except those areas, and the pool or pools, or portions lying thereunder, which are currently devoted to repressuring operations pursuant to an approved repressuring plan in accordance with the procedure prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 3320. Such hearing shall be set not later than 60 days from the date of the filing of such petition.

(b) If, after such public hearing and from the evidence adduced therefrom, and from such engineering studies as he may have ordered made and which have been presented and considered at such hearing, or at any prior hearing held for the purpose of considering a repressuring plan, the supervisor finds: 1. That repressuring operations of such pool or pools, or portions thereof, will tend to arrest or ameliorate subsidence; and2. That compulsory repressuring operations are required by reason of the failure, refusal or inability of the respective parties within the affected area to agree upon and initiate approved repressuring operations; and3. That subsidence of land overlying or immediately adjacent to such pool or pools is injuring or imperiling valuable buildings, or other improvements, or harbor installations or is interfering with commerce, navigation and fishery, or substantial portions of such lands may be inundated if subsidence continues, thereby endangering life, health, safety, peace, welfare and property; and4. That unit operation of such pool or pools, or portions thereof, is reasonably necessary to carry out repressuring operations in accordance with the theretofore adopted pressuring plan; and5. That the creation of the unit is feasible, necessary and justifiable under all conditions affecting the unit at the time of its creation or which can be reasonably anticipated by the supervisor at such time;
then the supervisor shall issue an order requiring unit operation of such pool or pools, or portions thereof, on such terms and conditions as may be determined from the evidence to be fair, reasonable, equitable and in conformance with said repressuring plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3322.

An order of the supervisor requiring unit operation, pursuant to Section 3321, may include lands owned by any person as defined in Section 3316.1, and shall contain such provisions as may be necessary or proper to protect, safeguard, and adjust the respective rights and obligations of the persons affected, including but not limited to lessees, operators, independent contractors, lien claimants, owners of mineral rights, royalties, working interests, production payments, mortgages, or deeds of trust. The order shall include:

(a) A description of the area embraced, termed the “unit area”;

(b) A general statement of the nature of the applicable repressuring plan and the specifications therefor adopted by the supervisor to arrest or ameliorate subsidence to be prescribed in a separate order of the supervisor requiring repressuring operations;

(c) That as a condition to the continued production by the owners or operators of oil or gas from such pool or pools, they shall initiate and conduct such repressuring operations as shall be prescribed in a separate order or orders of the supervisor;

(d) A formula for the apportionment and allocation of the unit production among and to the several separately owned tracts within the unit area such as reasonably will permit persons otherwise entitled to share in or benefit by the production from such separately owned tracts to produce or receive, in lieu thereof, their fair, equitable and reasonable share of the unit production or other benefits thereof. A separately owned tract’s fair, equitable, and reasonable share of the unit production shall be measured by the value of each such tract for oil and gas purposes and its contributing value to the unit in relation to like values of other tracts in the unit, taking into account acreage, the quantity and quality of oil and gas recoverable therefrom, location on structure, its probable productivity of oil and gas in the absence of unit operations, the burden of operation to which the tract will or is likely to be subjected, or so many of such factors, and such other pertinent engineering geological, or operating factors as may be reasonably susceptible of determination;

Pending the adoption of a final formula for apportionment and allocation of unit production as above provided (which final formula must be adopted not later than 18 months from the effective date of the order of the supervisor requiring unit operation), an interim formula may be adopted based upon the gross oil production in the unit area during the calendar year preceding the date of such order of the supervisor, which shall be effective until the adoption of the final formula as above provided. The final formula, when adopted, shall be retroactive to the effective date of the order requiring unit operation and adjustment shall be made in the apportionment and allocation of production during such interim period in accordance with the final formula so adopted.

(e) Provisions for financing the unit and the further development and operation of the unit area and the basis, terms, and conditions on which the cost and expense thereof shall be apportioned among and assessed against the tracts and all interests therein, including a detailed accounting procedure governing all charges and credits incident to all operations within the unit. The expense of unit operation shall be chargeable to the separately owned tracts in the same proportion that such tracts share in the unit production, and the expenses chargeable to a tract shall be paid by the person who in the absence of unit operation would be responsible for the expense of developing and operating such tract. Subject to such terms and conditions as to time and rate of interest as may be fair to all concerned, reasonable provisions shall be made in the order for carrying or otherwise financing persons who are unable promptly to meet their financial obligations in connection with the unit repressuring operations, and upon application made prior to the entry of the order, for carrying a nonassenting working interest owner affected by a final order of the supervisor under Section 3321;

(f) A provision for the credits and charges to be made in the adjustment among the owners or operators of tracts within the unit area for their respective investments in wells, tanks, pumps, machinery, materials, and equipment contributed to the unit operation by the respective owners or operators. The net amount chargeable against the owner or operator of a separately owned tract shall be considered expenses of unit operation chargeable against such tract;

(g) A provision appointing an operating committee to have general overall management and control of the unit, including voting procedures, the conduct of its business and affairs and the operations to be carried on by it for the primary purpose of ameliorating or arresting subsidence, subject to the applicable repressuring plan, the specifications therefor and the unit order adopted by the supervisor. Such operating committee shall be composed of the persons primarily liable for the payment of the expenses of unit operation, or their representatives, which committee shall, within the time specified in the order, appoint a person to be known as the “unit operator,” who shall, under the direction and supervision of the operating committee, be responsible for the management and conduct of the unit operation;

(h) A provision specifying the method of voting upon any motion before the operating committee and the majority in number of votes necessary in order to carry a motion;

(i) That each vote upon a motion by the operating committee shall have a value corresponding to the percentage of the expense of unit operation borne by the person voting or his principal pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (e) of this section;

(j) If the operating committee fails to appoint the unit operator within the time specified in an order issued pursuant to this article, the supervisor shall appoint the unit operator;

(k) The time the unit operation shall commence, and the manner in which and the circumstances under which the unit operation shall terminate;

(l) Such additional provisions not inconsistent with this article which the supervisor deems appropriate for the accomplishment of the proposed plan of repressuring operations for the purpose of arresting or ameliorating subsidence within the unit area and the protection of all interested parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3322.1.

No order of the supervisor creating a unit and prescribing the plan of unitization applicable thereto shall become effective unless and until the plan of unitization has been signed, or in writing ratified or approved, by working interest owners who are entitled to 65 percent of the proceeds of production of oil and gas, prior to the payment of royalties, within the proposed unit area, measured by the production from such area in the calendar year preceding the date of the order of the supervisor creating such unit, and the supervisor has made a finding either in the order creating the unit or in a supplemental order that the plan of unitization has been so signed, ratified or approved by persons owning the required percentage interest in and to the unit area. Where the plan of unitization has not been so signed, ratified or approved by persons owning the required percentage interest in and to the unit area at the time the order creating the unit is made, the supervisor shall, upon petition and notice, hold such additional and supplemental hearings as may be requested or required to determine if and when the plan of unitization has been so signed, ratified or approved by persons owning the required percentage interest in and to such unit area and shall, in respect to such hearings, make and enter a finding of his determination in such regard. In the event persons owning the required percentage interest in and to the unit area have not so signed, ratified or approved the plan of unitization within a period of six months from and after the date on which the order creating the unit is made, the order creating the unit shall cease to be of further force and effect and shall be revoked by the supervisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3323.

Notice of the time and place of any hearing to be held by the supervisor shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the county in which the subsidence is alleged to be taking place, and notice thereof sent, in the manner prescribed by Section 3303 to the persons mentioned in such section within the area which will be the subject of his order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3324.

At hearings all persons interested are entitled to be heard and present evidence, both oral and written. All such persons shall be sworn, and a transcript of the proceedings shall be kept. The procedure to be followed by the supervisor with respect to the administering of oaths, applying for subpoenas for witnesses and for the production of books, records, well logs, production records, and other documents, the taking of depositions, and the penalties attaching for failure to comply with any order of the supervisor or subpoena issued, shall be in the manner as in this division provided. On the request of the supervisor, a hearing officer in the Office of Administrative Hearings may be assigned to assist in conducting the proceedings as provided in Section 11370.3 of the Government Code. The officer, however, shall not make the determination specified in Section 3321.

The provisions of Section 3234 prohibiting the giving of testimony as to the contents of records on file shall not apply to this article. All of these records shall be available and may be received in evidence in any public hearing or in any judicial proceeding herein provided for.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 288.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3325.

The supervisor shall make and enforce all rules and regulations necessary or proper to accomplish the purposes of this article or to administer or enforce any order issued pursuant thereto. Such rules and regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing at Section 11370), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3326.

An order requiring unit operation may be amended for good cause by a subsequent order entered by the supervisor, except that no such order or amendment shall change the percentage of oil and gas allocated to a separately owned tract by the original order except with the consent of all persons who might be adversely affected thereby. Before issuing any such order, he shall make similar findings as are required for an original order, and such new order shall be subject to the same requirements and restrictions that are applicable to an original order. The provisions of this section shall not prohibit the establishment of an interim formula for the apportionment and allocation of unit production pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3322.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3327.

Subject to the limitations in this article governing the creation of the unit previously established, the supervisor, by entry of a new order after a public hearing, may require unit operation in a pool, or a portion thereof, which embraces a unit area established by a previous order. Such new order, in providing for allocation of unit production from the enlarged unit area, shall first treat the unit area previously established as a single tract, and the portion of unit production so allocated thereto shall then be allocated among the separately owned tracts included in such previously established unit area in the same proportions as those specified therefor in the previous order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3328.

(a) The portion of unit production allocated to a separately owned tract shall be deemed, for all purposes, to have been actually produced from such tract, and operations conducted pursuant to the order of the supervisor shall be deemed for all purposes, to be the conduct of operations for the production of oil and gas from each separately owned tract in the unit area in the fulfillment of all the express or implied obligations, trust or otherwise, of the owner or any person interested in such tract under a lease, or any contract, or any trust or trust obligations applicable to such tract, insofar as they relate to the pool, or pools, or portions thereof, covered by such order.

(b) Such unit production shall be distributed among or the proceeds thereof paid to the several persons entitled to share in the production from such separately owned tract in the same manner, in the same proportions, and upon the same conditions that they would have participated and shared in the production or proceeds thereof from such separately owned tract had not said unit been organized. The share of the unit production allocated to each separately owned tract shall be delivered in kind to the persons entitled thereto by virtue of ownership of oil and gas rights therein or by purchase from such owners, subject to the right of the unit operator to a lien thereon for payment of unit expenses pursuant to the order of unitization.

(c) Operations carried on under and in accordance with the order of unitization shall be regarded and considered as a fulfillment of and compliance with all of the provisions, covenants, and conditions, express or implied, of the several oil and gas leases, contracts, other agreements or trusts pertaining to the development of lands included within the unit area. Wells drilled or operated on any part of the unit area no matter where located shall, for all purposes, be regarded as wells drilled on each separately owned tract within such unit area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3329.

The unit operator shall be authorized on behalf of and for the account of all the respective owners or possessors of the mineral rights within the unit area to supervise, manage and conduct the further development and operations for the production of oil, gas and other hydrocarbon substances from the unit area pursuant to the powers conferred, and subject to the limitations imposed by the provisions of this article and by the order of unitization.

The obligation or liability of the lessee or other owners of the mineral rights in the several separately owned tracts for the payment of unit expense shall at all times be several and not joint or collective and in no event shall a lessee or other owner of the mineral rights in the separately owned tract be chargeable with, be obligated or liable, directly or indirectly, for more than the amount apportioned, assessed or otherwise charged to his interest in such separately owned tract pursuant to the order of unitization and then only to the extent of the lien provided for in this section.

Subject to the provisions in the order of unitization, the unit operator shall have a lien upon all drilling and production equipment in and to each separately owned tract, and upon the portion of the unit production allocated to the working interest therein, to secure the payment of the amount of the unit expense chargeable to and assessed against such separately owned tract. Such lien may be enforced by the unit operator, as the agent of the respective owners or possessors of the mineral rights within the unit area, as against noncarried working interest owners, in the manner set forth in Section 3330. The interest of the lessee or other person who by lease, contract or otherwise is obligated or responsible for the costs and expenses of developing and operating a separately owned tract for the production of oil, gas and other hydrocarbon substances in the absence of unitization shall be solely responsible for and chargeable with any assessment for unit expense made against such tract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3330.

When unit expenses incurred by a unit operator on behalf of the unit have not been paid, the unit operator may, in order to secure payment of the amount due the unit operator, fix a lien upon the interest of the debtor in all drilling and production equipment of the debtor on the premises and upon his allocated portion of the unit production as and when produced from the unit area, by filing for record, with the recorder of the county where the property or a portion thereof involved is located, an affidavit setting forth (1) in general terms the kind of materials, tools, equipment or supplies furnished, labor or services performed, or expenditure incurred, and (2) a description of the land involved, the name of the debtor and his interest in the production from the unit area, and (3) the amount which is still due and unpaid, and (4) a statement that at least 20 days prior to the date of the affidavit the unit operator gave written notice to the debtor by registered mail at his last known address, setting forth the information required under subdivisions (1), (2) and (3) above. Any such affidavit shall be filed for record not later than 90 days after the delivery of the property or the completion of the labor or the incurring of the expenditure. The lien shall not be construed as constituting a lien upon real property as such, except as to the recoverable oil and gas lying thereunder, but otherwise shall be of the same nature and subject to foreclosure in the same manner and within the same time as mechanics’ liens. In any case where a unit operator is in possession of the production which is subject to the lien, he may sell such production or so much thereof as may be necessary to satisfy said lien; provided, that he shall hold or arrange for the holding of the proceeds of such sale for appropriate distribution upon the determination of the controversy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3331.

Any order issued by the supervisor pursuant to this article, from its effective date, shall be binding upon each person owning or claiming any legal or equitable interest in the area which is the subject of such order or in the oil and gas produced or to be produced therefrom or a right to participate in a share of the proceeds thereof. From the effective date of such an order it shall be unlawful for a person to drill, redrill, operate, work on or produce any well within such area otherwise than in conformity with the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3332.

Within 30 days after the written notice of the entry of a final order of the supervisor, or within such further time as the supervisor may grant for good cause shown, but in no event shall such time be extended more than 60 days from the written notice of entry of such final order, any person affected thereby may file with the supervisor an application for a rehearing in respect to any matter determined by such order, setting forth the particulars in which such order is considered to be objectionable. The supervisor shall grant or deny any such application in whole or in part within 30 days from the date of the filing thereof, and failure to act thereon within such period shall constitute a denial of such application. In the event that a rehearing is granted, notice to such effect shall be given to all persons affected by such order, advising them of the date of such rehearing and of their right to appear and be heard thereon. The date set for any such rehearing shall be not less than 30 days nor more than 60 days from the date the application for rehearing is granted, unless, upon good cause shown, the time is extended by the supervisor, but in no event shall such time be extended more than 90 days from the date such application for rehearing is granted. The supervisor may enter an amended order or a new order after the rehearing as may be required under the circumstances. The provision of Article 6 (commencing with Section 3350) of Chapter 1 of Division 3 relating to appeals and review shall not apply to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 765.)
-------------------------------------------

3333.

(a) A final order of the supervisor shall be subject to judicial review by filing a petition for a writ of mandate in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing at Section 1084) of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the superior court of any county in which all or any part of the area affected is located, except that any such proceedings shall be instituted within 30 days from the date that a certified copy of the transcript of the proceedings before the supervisor has been delivered to the applicant; otherwise, the findings and determination of the supervisor shall be deemed final and conclusive. Any action so filed shall incorporate therein a certified copy of the transcript of the proceedings before the supervisor.
